Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 4. Transfer of Vehicle.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, § 35 et seq.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, §§ 297, 298.

Sec. 28.10.271.
Transfer of vehicle by owner.

When the owner of a registered vehicle transfers or assigns the owner’s title or interest in the vehicle, the registration of the vehicle expires; however, the registration plates remain on the vehicle except as otherwise provided in AS

28.10.181

.

The owner shall, at the time of delivery of the vehicle, endorse an assignment and warranty of title to the transferee in the space provided on the certificate of title. The owner shall deliver the certificates of title and registration to the transferee at the time of delivery of the vehicle, except as otherwise provided in AS

28.10.291

.

The owner shall notify the department of the transfer or assignment of the owner’s title or interest in the vehicle within 10 days following transfer or assignment. This notification shall constitute a valid transfer under AS

28.10.321

and

28.10.361

. The notice form to be provided by the department must include the following information:

name and address of owner;

name and address of transferee;

date of transfer or assignment; and

description and license number of vehicle.

An emissions inspection and maintenance certificate

shall be obtained when ownership of a vehicle subject to registration under this chapter is transferred if the

transferee resides in an area designated by the Department of Environmental Conservation as an emissions inspection and maintenance area;

vehicle would be subject to an emissions inspection and maintenance program; and

vehicle

has not been inspected for emissions, or the existing emissions inspection occurred more than two years ago; or

has a certificate of inspection, but the certificate shows that the vehicle is not in compliance with program requirements;

need not be obtained under (1) of this subsection if, when ownership of vehicle is transferred,

the transferor surrenders the vehicle’s registration plates and all evidence of registration in the transferor’s possession or control to the department; or

the vehicle has a valid, existing emissions inspection and maintenance program seasonal waiver and the purchaser signs a seasonal waiver transfer acknowledgment form approved by the department.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 97 SLA 2003)

Sec. 28.10.280.
Title for vehicles of other state. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.281.
Transfer to dealer.

When the owner of a registered vehicle transfers or assigns the owner’s title or interest to a vehicle dealer under AS

28.10.271

, the dealer is not required to present the certificates of registration and title to the department as provided in AS

28.10.321

and

28.10.361

until the vehicle is transferred by the dealer.

A vehicle transferred to a dealer may not be driven unless it is reregistered under this chapter or is driven under dealer registration plates issued under AS

28.10.181(j)

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.290.
Temporary permits. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.291.
Transfer from dealer.

A vehicle dealer, upon transferring a vehicle, shall execute an assignment and a warranty of title to the transferee as provided in AS

28.10.271

and furnish proof of the sale of the vehicle to the transferee.

The dealer shall, within 30 days of the transfer of the vehicle, forward to the department the transferee’s completed application for new certificates of title and registration except as provided in (c) of this section. The application must contain the vehicle dealer’s license number and must be accompanied by any required fees and taxes.

If the transferee indicates in a sworn affidavit that the transferee does not intend to use the vehicle in a manner requiring registration in this state, the dealer may deliver the certificate of title to the transferee directly. The dealer shall mail or deliver the affidavit to the department within five days of the transfer.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.300.
False statements. [Repealed, § 25, ch 144 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 28.10.301.
Transfer of motor vehicle to minor.

An agreement for the purchase of a motor vehicle by a minor who has not been emancipated is void unless a parent or guardian of the minor is also a party to the agreement.

If a vehicle is improperly transferred to a minor, the title to and registration of the vehicle remains with the owner and does not transfer to the minor or the parent or guardian of the minor. However, if the certificate of title and registration for the vehicle has been delivered to the minor or the parent or guardian of the minor, that person shall immediately deliver the certificate of title and registration to the department. The department shall reissue title to the previous owner of record.

In this section, “emancipated” means that a minor to whom the term refers is a resident of this state and is at least 16 years of age, is living separate and apart from the minor’s parents or guardian, and is capable of self-support and of managing the minor’s own financial affairs.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly (c) and subsection (c) was formerly (b).
Relettered in 2006.

Sec. 28.10.310.
Refusal. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.311.
Transfer by operation of law.

When the title to, or interest in, a registered vehicle passes to another person other than by a voluntary transfer, the registration of that vehicle expires.

A person holding a certificate of title to a vehicle whose interest in the vehicle has been extinguished or transferred other than by voluntary transfer shall mail or deliver the certificates of title and registration to the department upon request of the department. The delivery of the certificates of title and registration to the department upon its request does not affect the rights of the person surrendering the certificate of title, and the action of the department in issuing a new certificate of title or registration as provided in this chapter is not conclusive upon the rights of an owner or lienholder named in the surrendered certificate of title.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.320.
Issuance. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.321.
New owner to secure transfer of registration and new title.

Except as provided under AS

28.10.281

and

28.10.291

, the new owner shall, within 30 days, present the certificates of title and registration properly endorsed to the department, apply for a new title, and register the vehicle as upon an original registration.

An application for certificates of title and registration must be accompanied by any required registration fees and taxes, transfer of title and lien fees, and by the previous certificates of title and registration, if any.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 40 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Sec. 28.10.330.
Delivery. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.331.
Department to issue new certificates of title and registration.

The department, upon receipt of the certificate of title properly endorsed, the certificate of registration, the registration plates, if any, the application for new title and registration, and all required fees and taxes, shall issue a certificate of title and a certificate of registration to the transferee or the lienholder lawfully entitled to the certificates.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.340.
Duplicates. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.341.
Duty of lienholder in possession of title to transferred vehicle.

Upon request of an owner or transferee, a lienholder in possession of the certificate of title to a transferred vehicle shall, unless the transfer is in breach of a security agreement, deliver the certificate to the transferee. The delivery of the certificate of title does not affect the rights of the lienholder under the lienholder’s security agreement.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.350.
Transfer. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.351.
Dismantling or wrecking vehicle.

A person who dismantles, scraps, or destroys a registered vehicle shall immediately forward to the department the certificates of title and registration and the registration plates for the vehicle.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Secs. 28.10.355,
28.10.360.
Purchase by minor; duty of new owner. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.361.
When transfer effective.

A transfer by an owner or dealer is not effective until all applicable provisions of this chapter have been complied with.
However, an owner or dealer who has delivered possession of a vehicle to the transferee and has endorsed an assignment and warranty of title on the certificate of title and delivered the certificates of title and registration to the transferee or, in the case of a transfer from a dealer, delivered proof of the sale to the transferee, is not liable as the owner for any liabilities resulting from the driving or movement of the vehicle after the transfer.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.370.
Issuance. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]